New Jersey, session 222, S3431.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   Section 1 of P.L.2015, c.218 (C.39:4-207.10) is amended to read as follows: 1. a.  A person who is a disabled veteran or a recipient of the Purple Heart is exempt from the payment of municipal parking meter fees when a motor vehicle [owned by the disabled veteran or the Purple Heart recipient] displays disabled veterans or Purple Heart license plates or a placard issued by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission pursuant to the provisions of Title 39 of the Revised Statutes [, unless the vehicle has been parked in one location for more than 24 hours].  The exemption provided under this subsection shall apply only when the disabled veteran or recipient of the Purple Heart to whom the special license plates or placards have been issued is either the driver [,] or a passenger [,] of the motor vehicle and shall not apply when the motor vehicle is parked for more than 24 hours at one location where the motor vehicle is subject to a municipal parking meter fee. b.   The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of subsection a. of this section, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), and shall include provisions for the issuance of disabled veteran's or Purple Heart recipient's placards by the commission. (cf: P.L.2015, c.218, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.